Maine, session 132, LD1834.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §2436, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 232, §1, is
further amended to read:
1-A. A claimant, including a health care provider, may submit simultaneously a claim
for payment with all carriers potentially liable for payment of the claim whether primary
or secondary. Payment or denial of a claim by each carrier must be made within 30 calendar
days after the carrier has received all information needed to pay or deny the claim whether
or not another carrier with which it is attempting to coordinate has acted on the claim. Upon
request by a health care provider, a carrier shall provide the health care provider a method
for making a claims payment using an electronic funds transfer through the automated
clearinghouse network. Any payment made must be in accordance with rules adopted by
the superintendent relative to coordination of benefits. For the purposes of this subsection,
"health care provider" includes a person licensed to provide dental care services under Title
32, chapter 143, subchapter 3 and "carrier" includes an insurer that provides dental
insurance.
Page 1 - 132LR1972(03)